Illinois, session 104th, SB1185.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by adding 5Section 5-156.5 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/5-156.5 new)7    Sec. 5-156.5. Presumption of disability; reinstatement. 8    (a) A policeman who applies for disability benefits under 9this Article and has been denied reinstatement as a policeman 10by his or her employer because of a physical or mental 11incapacity shall be presumed to be disabled as that term is 12used in this Article.13    (b) No policeman who otherwise meets the requirements for 14a disability benefit shall be denied a disability benefit 15unless and until the policeman's employer reinstates him or 16her as a policeman or offers him or her a limited-duty 17position.18    (c) Any policeman who has been denied a disability benefit 19without an offer of reinstatement or a limited-duty position 20after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th 21General Assembly is entitled to disability benefits. 22    Section 90. The State Mandates Act is amended by adding   SB1185- 2 -LRB104 07675 RPS 17719 b1Section 8.49 as follows: 2    (30 ILCS 805/8.49 new)3    Sec. 8.49. Exempt mandate. Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 48 of this Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for 5the implementation of any mandate created by this amendatory 6Act of the 104th General Assembly. 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 8becoming law.